Maryland, session 2025, SB0205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
1–201.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person may not disclose
any information concerning an applicant for or recipient of social services, child welfare
services, cash assistance, food stamps, or medical assistance that is directly or indirectly
derived from the records, investigations, or communications of the State, a county, or a
– 1 –

Ch. 38 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
municipal corporation or a unit of the State, a county, or a municipal corporation or that is
acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.
(b) This section does not prohibit the disclosure of information:
(1) in accordance with a court order;
(2) to an officer or employee of any state or local government[,] OR the
United States, [or a fiduciary institution,] if the officer or employee is entitled to the
information in an official capacity and the disclosure is necessary to administer:
(i) public assistance, medical assistance, social services, or child
welfare services programs; or
(ii) voter registration in accordance with § 3–203 of the Election Law
Article; [or]
(3) to a fiduciary institution that reported suspected financial abuse or
financial exploitation, if the fiduciary institution is authorized to request the information
under § 1–306(h) of the Financial Institutions Article; OR
(4) RELATING TO ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES, TO AN OFFICER OR
EMPLOYEE OF ANY STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR THE UNITED STATES IF THE
OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION IN
AN OFFICIAL CAPACITY AND THE DISCLOSURE IS RELEVANT TO THE INVESTIGATION.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 90 days or a fine not exceeding $500 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Family Law
14–101.
(g) (1) “Health practitioner” includes any person who is authorized to practice
healing under the Health Occupations Article OR, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, § 13–516 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(2) “HEALTH PRACTITIONER” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN EMERGENCY
MEDICAL DISPATCHER, AS DEFINED IN § 13–516 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 38
Article – Family Law
14–302.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, notwithstanding
any law on privileged communications, each health practitioner, police officer, or human
service worker who contacts, examines, attends, or treats an alleged vulnerable adult, and
who has reason to believe that the alleged vulnerable adult has been subjected to abuse,
neglect, self–neglect, or exploitation shall:
(i) notify the local department; and
(ii) if acting as a staff member of a hospital or public health agency,
immediately notify and give all the information required by this section to the head of the
institution or the designee of the head.
(2) An ombudsman, as defined in § 10–901 of the Human Services Article,
shall comply with 42 U.S.C. § 3058g(d)(2) and may not disclose the identity of a resident or
complainant except as authorized under 42 U.S.C. § 3058g(d)(2).
(b) An individual who is required to make a report under subsection (a) of this
section shall make the report AS SOON AS POSSIBLE by telephone, BY direct
communication, or in writing to the local department [as soon as possible] OR BY CALLING
THE STATEWIDE REPORTING HOTLINE.
14–308.
(a) Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the identity of any
person who makes a report under § 14–302 of this subtitle shall be confidential.
(b) The identity of a person who makes a report under § 14–302 of this subtitle
may be disclosed if:
(1) the person consents; [or]
(2) the court orders the disclosure; OR
(3) THE DISCLOSURE OCCURS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–201 OF THE
HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 38 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 4 –